src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON Num

+Num: Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON Numbers

нэг:нэг Num ;            ! "one"
хоёр:хоёр Num ;          ! "two"
гурав:гур%{а%}в Num ;    ! "three"
дөрөв:дөр%{а%}в Num ;    ! "four"
тав:тав Num ;            ! "five"
зургаа:зургаа Num ;      ! "six"
долоо:долоо Num ;        ! "seven"
найм:найм Num ;          ! "eight"
ёс:ёс Num ;              ! "nine"
арав:ар%{а%}в Num ;      ! "ten"
зуун:зуун Num ;          ! "hundred"
мянга:мянга Num ;        ! "thousand"
